Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-1306
Request for external review.

(1)(a) Except for a request
for an expedited external review as set forth in section 44-1309, all requests
for external review shall be made in writing to the director.

(b) The director may prescribe
by rule and regulation the form and content of external review requests required
to be submitted under this section.

(2) A covered person or the covered person's authorized
representative may make a request for an external review of an adverse determination
or final adverse determination.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 6.